California, session 20252026, AB2719.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 610.5 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:610.5. “Title,” “certificate of title,” or “certificate of ownership” means an official record, whether in paper or electronic form, establishing and providing proof of legal ownership of a vehicle.SECTION 1.Section 5600.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5600.5.Ownership of title to a vehicle subject to registration may be transferred to two or more coowners as transferee to be held as provided in Section 682 of the Civil Code, except that:(a)A vehicle may be registered in the names of two or more persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or.” A vehicle so registered in the alternative shall be deemed to be held in joint tenancy. Each coowner shall be deemed to have granted to the other coowners the absolute right to dispose of the title and interest in the vehicle. Upon the death of a coowner the interest of the decedent shall pass to the survivor as though title or interest in the vehicle was held in joint tenancy unless a contrary intention is set forth in writing upon the request for transfer of registration.(b)A vehicle may be registered in the names of two or more persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or” and if declared in writing upon the application for a transfer of registration by the applicants to be community property, or tenancy in common, shall grant to each coowner the absolute power to transfer the title or interest of the other coowners only during the lifetime of such coowners.(c)A vehicle may be registered in the names of two or more persons as coowners in the conjunctive by the use of the word “and” and shall thereafter require the signature of each coowner or their personal representative to transfer title to the vehicle, except where title to the vehicle is set forth in joint tenancy, the signature of each coowner or their personal representative shall be required only during the lifetime of the coowners, and upon death of a coowner title shall pass to the surviving coowner.(d)The department may adopt suitable abbreviations to appear upon the certificate of registration and certificate of ownership to designate the manner in which the interest in or title to the vehicle is held if set forth by the coowners upon the application for transfer of registration.